District of Columbia statutes.
10-155

Anacostia Park.

The entire area of the Anacostia River and Flats reclaimed and to be reclaimed from the mouth of the river to the District line is made and declared a part of the park system of the District of Columbia and designated Anacostia Park.

Aug. 31, 1918, 40 Stat. 950, ch. 164, § 1
1981 Ed., § 8-155.
1973 Ed., § 8-161.
Tree nursery: Act of May 7, 1926, 44 Stat. 405, ch. 251, transferred to the jurisdiction of the District of Columbia a certain portion of Anacostia Park for use as a tree nursery.